src/egy_lex/verb.lexc
!!!verb.lexc!!!

LEXICON Root
Prefixes;
Verb;

LEXICON Prefixes
0:0 ConjPrefixes;
ب+:ب^ ConjPrefixes;
ح+:ح^ ConjPrefixes;

LEXICON ConjPrefixes
0:0 Verb;
ت:ت^ Verb;
ي:ي^ Verb;
ن:ن^ Verb;
